District of Columbia statutes.
29-807.03

Known claims against dissolved limited liability company.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, a dissolved limited liability company may give notice of a known claim under subsection (b) of this section, which shall have the effect as provided in subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

A dissolved limited liability company may in a record notify its known claimants of the dissolution. The notice shall:

(1)

Specify the information required to be included in a claim;

(2)

Provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent;

(3)

State the deadline for receipt of the claim, which shall not be less than 120 days after the date the notice is received by the claimant; and

(4)

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

(c)

A claim against a dissolved limited liability company shall be barred if the requirements of subsection (b) of this section are met and:

(1)

The claim is not received by the specified deadline; or

(2)

If the claim is timely received but rejected by the company:

(A)

The company causes the claimant to receive a notice in a record stating that the claim is rejected and will be barred unless the claimant commences an action against the company to enforce the claim within 90 days after the claimant receives the notice; and

(B)

The claimant does not commence the required action within the 90 days.

(d)

This section shall not apply to a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution or a liability that on that date is contingent.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-804.05 and § 29-807.04.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 703 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).